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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIAT5-01

DTC B0118/46 Short in Side Squib LH Circuit (to B+)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The side squib LH circuit consists of the airbag sensor assembly and the side airbag assembly LH.
It causes the SRS to deploy when the SRS deployment conditions are satisfied.

For details of the function of each component, see OPERATION on page RS-3.

DTC B0118/46 is recorded when a B+ short is detected in the side squib LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
¢ Shortin side squib LH circuit (to B+) « Side airbag assembly LH (Side squib LH)
B0118/46 « Side squib LH malfunction « Airbag sensorassembly
« Airbag sensor assembly malfunction e FloorNo. 1 wire
HINT:

DTC B0118/46 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag.

WIRING DIAGRAM
See page DI-432.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-432).
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2CHeckfloorNo. 1 wire(sidesquibLH circuit).

ON  Floor No. 1 Wire CHECK: N ,
@ (@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.
CD Q__LD :| Airbag (b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and SFL+
Side Squib LH Sensor of the floor No. 1 wire connector on the side airbag assem-
:l Assembly bly LH (side squib LH) side.
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Voltage: Below 1V
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3 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Using a service wire, connect SFL+ and SFL- of the floor
No. 1 wire connector on the side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH) side.

(e) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
DTCBO 118/46is not output.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0118/46 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG> Replace airbag sensor assembly.
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4 | Check side squib LH.
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PREPARATION:

(@  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

() Connect the side airbag assembly LH (side squib LH)
connector.

(d) Connect the negative (-) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
(c) Turntheignition switchto LOCK, and waitatleastfor 10

seconds.

(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

DTCBO 118/46is notoutput.
HINT:
Codes other than code B0118/46 may be output at this time, but
they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace side airbag assembly LH
(side squib LH).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check. If the malfunctioning part can not be
detected by the simulation method, replace all SRS components including the wire harness.
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